Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE C. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM

CHAPTER 68. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS AT ARLINGTON

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 68.01. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "University" means The University of Texas at Arlington.

(2) "Board" means the board of regents of The University of Texas System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3162, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 68.02. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS AT ARLINGTON. The University of Texas at Arlington is a four-year and graduate-level coeducational institution of higher education within The University of Texas System. It is under the management and control of the board of regents of The University of Texas System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3162, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 68.03. BUILDINGS. It is the intent of the legislature that future building needs of The University of Texas at Arlington shall be financed from some source or sources other than The University of Texas' share of the principal and/or interest of and from the Permanent University Fund.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3162, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 68.06. ROLE AND SCOPE; COURSES AND DEGREES. The board is authorized to maintain, operate, and administer The University of Texas at Arlington as a general academic institution of higher education offering a standard four-year undergraduate program. The board shall have the authority to prescribe courses leading to such customary degrees as are offered at leading American universities and to award such degrees. It is the intent of the legislature that such degrees shall include baccalaureate, master's, and doctoral degrees and their equivalents; but no department, school, or degree program shall be instituted except with the prior approval of the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3360, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 38, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 68.03 by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 8.01(11), eff. Nov. 12, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD

Sec. 68.21. SUSTAINABLE WATER SUPPLY RESEARCH CENTER. (a) In this section, "center" means the Sustainable Water Supply Research Center.

(b) The board may establish and operate the Sustainable Water Supply Research Center as part of The University of Texas at Arlington.

(c) If established, the center shall:

(1) conduct, sponsor, or direct multidisciplinary research directed toward:

(A) promoting water conservation through development of a sustainable water supply for this state; and

(B) mitigating the effect of diminishing water supplies on the economy and people of this state; and

(2) conduct a comprehensive, interdisciplinary instructional program in water conservation with emphasis on development of a sustainable water supply at the graduate level and offer undergraduate courses for students interested in water conservation and sustainable water supply development.

(d) The organization, control, and management of the center are vested in the board.

(e) The center may enter into an agreement or may cooperate with a public or private entity to perform the research functions of the center.

(f) The board may solicit, accept, and administer gifts and grants from any public or private source for the use and benefit of the center.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.26, eff. September 1, 2007.